California statutes. Penal Code
A law enforcement agency applying for disclosure of patient records under Section 1543 may petition the court for an extraordinary order delaying the notice of the application to the health care facility required by subdivision (f) of Section 1543 for a period of 30 days, upon a showing of good cause to believe that notice would seriously impede the investigation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1080, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1545.

For the purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Health care facility” means any clinic, health dispensary, or health facility, licensed pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 1200) of the Health and Safety Code, or any mental hospital, drug abuse clinic, or detoxification center.

(b) “Law enforcement agency” means the Attorney General of the State of California, every district attorney, and every agency of the State of California expressly authorized by statute to investigate or prosecute law violators.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1080, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.6. Electronic Communications Privacy Act [1546. - 1546.5.]

1546.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) An “adverse result” means any of the following:

(1) Danger to the life or physical safety of an individual.

(2) Flight from prosecution.

(3) Destruction of or tampering with evidence.

(4) Intimidation of potential witnesses.

(5) Serious jeopardy to an investigation or undue delay of a trial.

(b) “Authorized possessor” means the possessor of an electronic device when that person is the owner of the device or has been authorized to possess the device by the owner of the device.

(c) “Electronic communication” means the transfer of signs, signals, writings, images, sounds, data, or intelligence of any nature in whole or in part by a wire, radio, electromagnetic, photoelectric, or photo-optical system.

(d) “Electronic communication information” means any information about an electronic communication or the use of an electronic communication service, including, but not limited to, the contents, sender, recipients, format, or location of the sender or recipients at any point during the communication, the time or date the communication was created, sent, or received, or any information pertaining to any individual or device participating in the communication,
 including, but not limited to, an IP address. “Electronic communication information” does not include subscriber information as defined in this chapter.

(e) “Electronic communication service” means a service that provides to its subscribers or users the ability to send or receive electronic communications, including any service that acts as an intermediary in the transmission of electronic communications, or stores electronic communication information.

(f) “Electronic device” means a device that stores, generates, or transmits information in electronic form. An electronic device does not include the magnetic strip on a driver’s license or an identification card issued by this state or a driver’s license or equivalent identification card issued by another state.

(g) “Electronic device information” means any
 information stored on or generated through the operation of an electronic device, including the current and prior locations of the device.

(h) “Electronic information” means electronic communication information or electronic device information.

(i) “Government entity” means a department or agency of the state or a political subdivision thereof, or an individual acting for or on behalf of the state or a political subdivision thereof.

(j) “Service provider” means a person or entity offering an electronic communication service.

(k) “Specific consent” means consent provided directly to the government entity seeking information, including, but not limited to, when the government entity is the addressee or intended recipient or a member of the intended
 audience of an electronic communication. Specific consent does not require that the originator of the communication have actual knowledge that an addressee, intended recipient, or member of the specific audience is a government entity.

(l) “Subscriber information” means the name, street address, telephone number, email address, or similar contact information provided by the subscriber to the service provider to establish or maintain an account or communication channel, a subscriber or account number or identifier, the length of service, and the types of services used by a user of or subscriber to a service provider.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 541, Sec. 2.   (SB 1121)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1546.1.

(a) Except as provided in this section, a government entity shall not do any of the following:

(1) Compel the production of or access to electronic communication information from a service provider.

(2) Compel the production of or access to electronic device information from any person or entity other than the authorized possessor of the device.

(3) Access electronic device information by means of physical interaction or electronic communication with the electronic device. This section does not prohibit the intended recipient of an electronic communication from voluntarily disclosing electronic
 communication information concerning that communication to a government entity.

(b) A government entity may compel the production of or access to electronic communication information from a service provider, or compel the production of or access to electronic device information from any person or entity other than the authorized possessor of the device only under the following circumstances:

(1) Pursuant to a warrant issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1523) and subject to subdivision (d).

(2) Pursuant to a wiretap order issued pursuant to Chapter 1.4 (commencing with Section 629.50) of Title 15 of Part 1.

(3) Pursuant to an order for electronic reader records issued pursuant to Section 1798.90 of the Civil Code.

(4) Pursuant to a subpoena issued pursuant to existing state law, provided that the information is not sought for the purpose of investigating or prosecuting a criminal offense, and compelling the production of or access to the information via the subpoena is not otherwise prohibited by state or federal law. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to expand any authority under state law to compel the production of or access to electronic information.

(5) Pursuant to an order for a pen register or trap and trace device, or both, issued pursuant to Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 630) of Title 15 of Part 1.

(c) A government entity may access electronic device information by means of physical interaction or electronic communication with the device only as follows:

(1) Pursuant to a warrant issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1523) and subject to subdivision (d).

(2) Pursuant to a wiretap order issued pursuant to Chapter 1.4 (commencing with Section 629.50) of Title 15 of Part 1.

(3) Pursuant to a tracking device search warrant issued pursuant to paragraph (12) of subdivision (a) of Section 1524 and subdivision (b) of Section 1534.

(4) With the specific consent of the authorized possessor of the device.

(5) With the specific consent of the owner of the device, only when the device has been reported as lost or stolen.

(6) If the government entity, in good faith, believes that
 an emergency involving danger of death or serious physical injury to any person requires access to the electronic device information.

(7) If the government entity, in good faith, believes the device to be lost, stolen, or abandoned, provided that the government entity shall only access electronic device information in order to attempt to identify, verify, or contact the owner or authorized possessor of the device.

(8) Except where prohibited by state or federal law, if the device is seized from an inmate’s possession or found in an area of a correctional facility or a secure area of a local detention facility where inmates have access, the device is not in the possession of an individual, and the device is not known or believed to be the possession of an authorized visitor. This paragraph shall not be construed to supersede or override Section 4576.

(9) Except where prohibited by state or federal law, if the device is seized from an authorized possessor of the device who is serving a term of parole under the supervision of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or a term of postrelease community supervision under the supervision of county probation.

(10) Except where prohibited by state or federal law, if the device is seized from an authorized possessor of the device who is subject to an electronic device search as a clear and unambiguous condition of probation, mandatory supervision, or pretrial release.

(11) If the government entity accesses information concerning the location or the telephone number of the electronic device in order to respond to an emergency 911 call from that device.

(12) Pursuant to an order for a pen register or trap and trace device, or both, issued pursuant to Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 630) of Title 15 of Part 1.

(d) Any warrant for electronic information shall comply with the following:

(1) The warrant shall describe with particularity the information to be seized by specifying, as appropriate and reasonable, the time periods covered, the target individuals or accounts, the applications or services covered, and the types of information sought, provided, however, that in the case of a warrant described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), the court may determine that it is not appropriate to specify time periods because of the specific circumstances of the investigation, including, but not limited to, the nature of the device to be searched.

(2) The
 warrant shall require that any information obtained through the execution of the warrant that is unrelated to the objective of the warrant shall be sealed and shall not be subject to further review, use, or disclosure except pursuant to a court order or to comply with discovery as required by Sections 1054.1 and 1054.7. A court shall issue such an order upon a finding that there is probable cause to believe that the information is relevant to an active investigation, or review, use, or disclosure is required by state or federal law.

(3) The warrant shall comply with all other provisions of California and federal law, including any provisions prohibiting, limiting, or imposing additional requirements on the use of search warrants. If directed to a service provider, the warrant shall be accompanied by an order requiring the service provider to verify the authenticity of electronic information that it produces by providing an affidavit that
 complies with the requirements set forth in Section 1561 of the Evidence Code. Admission of that information into evidence shall be subject to Section 1562 of the Evidence Code.

(e) When issuing any warrant or order for electronic information, or upon the petition from the target or recipient of the warrant or order, a court may, at its discretion, do either or both of the following:

(1) Appoint a special master, as described in subdivision (d) of Section 1524, charged with ensuring that only information necessary to achieve the objective of the warrant or order is produced or accessed.

(2) Require that any information obtained through the execution of the warrant or order that is unrelated to the objective of the warrant be destroyed as soon as feasible after the termination of the current investigation and any
 related investigations or proceedings.

(f) A service provider may voluntarily disclose electronic communication information or subscriber information when that disclosure is not otherwise prohibited by state or federal law.

(g) If a government entity receives electronic communication information voluntarily provided pursuant to subdivision (f), it shall destroy that information within 90 days unless one or more of the following circumstances apply:

(1) The government entity has or obtains the specific consent of the sender or recipient of the electronic communications about which information was disclosed.

(2) The government entity obtains a court order authorizing the retention of the information. A court shall issue a retention order upon a finding
 that the conditions justifying the initial voluntary disclosure persist, in which case the court shall authorize the retention of the information only for so long as those conditions persist, or there is probable cause to believe that the information constitutes evidence that a crime has been committed.

(3) The government entity reasonably believes that the information relates to child pornography and the information is retained as part of a multiagency database used in the investigation of child pornography and related crimes.

(4) The service provider or subscriber is, or discloses the information to, a federal, state, or local prison, jail, or juvenile detention facility, and all participants to the electronic communication were informed, prior to the communication, that the service provider may disclose the information to the government entity.

(h) If a government entity obtains electronic information pursuant to an emergency involving danger of death or serious physical injury to a person, that requires access to the electronic information without delay, the government entity shall, within three court days after obtaining the electronic information, file with the appropriate court an application for a warrant or order authorizing obtaining the electronic information or a motion seeking approval of the emergency disclosures that shall set forth the facts giving rise to the emergency, and if applicable, a request supported by a sworn affidavit for an order delaying notification under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1546.2. The court shall promptly rule on the application or motion and shall order the immediate destruction of all information obtained, and immediate notification pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1546.2 if that notice has not already been given, upon a
 finding that the facts did not give rise to an emergency or upon rejecting the warrant or order application on any other ground. This subdivision does not apply if the government entity obtains information concerning the location or the telephone number of the electronic device in order to respond to an emergency 911 call from that device.

(i) This section does not limit the authority of a government entity to use an administrative, grand jury, trial, or civil discovery subpoena to do any of the following:

(1) Require an originator, addressee, or intended recipient of an electronic communication to disclose any electronic communication information associated with that communication.

(2) Require an entity that provides electronic communications services to its officers, directors, employees, or agents for the purpose
 of carrying out their duties, to disclose electronic communication information associated with an electronic communication to or from an officer, director, employee, or agent of the entity.

(3) Require a service provider to provide subscriber information.

(j) This section does not limit the authority of the Public Utilities Commission or the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission to obtain energy or water supply and consumption information pursuant to the powers granted to them under the Public Utilities Code or the Public Resources Code and other applicable state laws.

(k) This chapter shall not be construed to alter the authority of a government entity that owns an electronic device to compel an employee who is authorized to possess the device to return the device to the government entity’s
 possession.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 541, Sec. 3.5.   (SB 1121)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1546.2.

(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, any government entity that executes a warrant, or obtains electronic information in an emergency pursuant to Section 1546.1, shall serve upon, or deliver to by registered or first-class mail, electronic mail, or other means reasonably calculated to be effective, the identified targets of the warrant or emergency access, a notice that informs the recipient that information about the recipient has been compelled or obtained, and states with reasonable specificity the nature of the government investigation under which the information is sought. The notice shall include a copy of the warrant or a written statement setting forth facts giving rise to the emergency. The notice
 shall be provided contemporaneously with the execution of a warrant, or, in the case of an emergency, within three court days after obtaining the electronic information.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), notice is not required if the government entity accesses information concerning the location or the telephone number of an electronic device in order to respond to an emergency 911 call from that device.

(b) (1) When a warrant is sought or electronic information is obtained in an emergency under Section 1546.1, the government entity may submit a request supported by a sworn affidavit for an order delaying notification and prohibiting any party providing information from notifying any other party that information has been sought. The court shall issue the order if
 the court determines that there is reason to believe that notification may have an adverse result, but only for the period of time that the court finds there is reason to believe that the notification may have that adverse result, and not to exceed 90 days.

(2) The court may grant extensions of the delay of up to 90 days each on the same grounds as provided in paragraph (1).

(3) Upon expiration of the period of delay of the notification, the government entity shall serve upon, or deliver to by registered or first-class mail, electronic mail, or other means reasonably calculated to be effective as specified by the court issuing the order authorizing delayed notification, the identified targets of the warrant or emergency access, a document that includes the information described
 in subdivision (a), a copy of all electronic information obtained or a summary of that information, including, at a minimum, the number and types of records disclosed, the date and time when the earliest and latest records were created, and a statement of the grounds for the court’s determination to grant a delay in notifying the individual.

(c) If there is no identified target of a warrant or emergency access at the time of its issuance, the government entity shall submit to the Department of Justice within three days of the execution of the warrant or issuance of the request all of the information required in subdivision (a). If an order delaying notice is obtained pursuant to subdivision (b), the government entity shall submit to the department upon the expiration of the period of delay of the notification all of the information required in
 paragraph (3) of subdivision (b). The department shall publish all those reports on its Internet Web site within 90 days of receipt. The department may redact names or other personal identifying information from the reports.

(d) Except as otherwise provided in this section, nothing in this chapter shall prohibit or limit a service provider or any other party from disclosing information about any request or demand for electronic information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 269, Sec. 10.   (SB 811)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1546.4.

(a) Any person in a trial, hearing, or proceeding may move to suppress any electronic information obtained or retained in violation of the Fourth Amendment to the United States Constitution or of this chapter. The motion shall be made, determined, and be subject to review in accordance with the procedures set forth in subdivisions (b) to (q), inclusive, of Section 1538.5.

(b) The Attorney General may commence a civil action to compel any government entity to comply with the provisions of this chapter.

(c) An individual whose information is targeted by a warrant, order, or other legal process that
 is inconsistent with this chapter, or the California Constitution or the United States Constitution, or a service provider or any other recipient of the warrant, order, or other legal process may petition the issuing court to void or modify the warrant, order, or process, or to order the destruction of any information obtained in violation of this chapter, or the California Constitution, or the United States Constitution.

(d) A California or foreign corporation, and its officers, employees, and agents, are not subject to any cause of action for providing records, information, facilities, or assistance in accordance with the terms of a warrant, court order, statutory authorization, emergency certification, or wiretap order issued pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 651, Sec. 1.   (SB 178)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1546.5.

(a) A California corporation or a corporation whose principal executive offices are located in California that provides electronic communications services shall not, in California, provide records, information, facilities, or assistance in accordance with the terms of a warrant, court order, subpoena, wiretap order, pen register trap and trace order, or other legal process issued by, or pursuant to, the procedures of another state or a political subdivision thereof that relates to an investigation into or enforcement of a prohibited violation, as defined in Section 629.51.

(b) The Attorney General may commence a civil action to compel any California corporation or a corporation whose principal executive offices are located in California that
 provides electronic communications services to comply with the provisions of this section.

(c) A California corporation or a corporation whose principal executive offices are located in California, and its officers, employees, and agents, are not subject to any cause of action for providing records, information, facilities, or assistance in accordance with the terms of a warrant, court order, subpoena, wiretap order, pen register trap and trace order, or other legal process issued by, or pursuant to, the procedures of another state or a political subdivision thereof, except where the corporation knew or should have known that the warrant, court order, subpoena, wiretap order, pen register trap and trace order, or other legal process relates to an investigation into or enforcement of a prohibited violation, as defined in Section 629.51.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 627, Sec. 9.   (AB 1242)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Proceedings Against Fugitives From Justice [1547. - 1558.]

1547.

(a) The Governor may offer a reward of not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), payable out of the General Fund, for information leading to the arrest and conviction of any of the following:

(1) Any convict who has escaped from a state prison, prison camp, prison farm, or the custody of any prison officer or employee or as provided in Section 3059 or 4530.

(2) Any person who has committed, or is charged with
 the commission of, an offense punishable by death.

(3) (A) Any person engaged in the robbery or hijacking of, or any attempt to rob or hijack, any person upon or in charge of, in whole or in part, any public conveyance engaged at the time in carrying passengers within this state.

(B) As used in this paragraph, “hijacking” means an unauthorized person causing, or attempting to cause, by violence or threat of violence, a public conveyance to go to an unauthorized destination.

(4) Any person who attempts to murder either in the first or second degree, assaults with a deadly weapon, or inflicts serious bodily harm upon a peace officer or firefighter who is acting in the line of duty.

(5) Any person who has committed a crime involving
 the burning or bombing of public or private property, including any public hospital housed in a privately owned facility.

(6) Any person who has committed a crime involving the burning or bombing of any private hospital. A reward may be offered by the Governor in conjunction with that crime only if a reward in conjunction with the same crime is offered by the hospital, or any other public or private donor on its behalf. The amount of the reward offered by the Governor shall not exceed the aggregate amount offered privately, or fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), whichever is less. Nothing in this paragraph shall preclude a private hospital, or any public or private donor on its behalf, from offering a reward in an amount exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). If a person providing information for a reward under this paragraph so requests, his or her name and address shall remain confidential. This confidentiality, however, shall not preclude
 or obstruct the investigations of law enforcement authorities.

(7) Any person who commits a violation of Section 11413.

(8) Any person who commits a violation of Section 207.

(9) Any person who has committed a crime involving the burning or bombing of any bookstore or public or private library not subject to Section 11413. A reward may be offered by the Governor in conjunction with that crime only if a reward in conjunction with the same crime is offered by the bookstore or library, or any other public or private donor on its behalf. The amount of the reward offered by the Governor shall not exceed the aggregate amount offered privately, or fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), whichever is less. Nothing in this paragraph shall preclude a bookstore or public or private library, or any public or private donor on its
 behalf, from offering a reward in an amount exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). If a person providing information for a reward under this paragraph so requests, his or her name and address shall remain confidential. This confidentiality, however, shall not preclude or obstruct the investigations of law enforcement authorities.

(10) Any person who commits a violation of Section 454 or 463.

(11) Any person who willfully and maliciously sets fire to, or who attempts to willfully and maliciously set fire to, any property that is included within a hazardous fire area designated by the State Board of Forestry and Fire Protection pursuant to Section 4252 of the Public Resources Code or by the Director of Forestry and Fire Protection pursuant to Section 4253 of the Public Resources Code, if the fire, or attempt to set a fire, results in death or great bodily injury to anyone,
 including fire protection personnel, or if the fire causes substantial structural damage.

(12) Any person who has committed, or is charged with the commission of, a felony that is punishable under Section 422.75 and that resulted in serious bodily injury or in property damage of more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(13) Any person who commits an act that violates Section 11411, if the Governor determines that the act is one in a series of similar or related acts committed in violation of that section by the same person or group.

(b) The Governor may offer a reward of not more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for information leading to the arrest and conviction of any person who kills a peace officer or firefighter who is acting in the line of duty.

(c) The Governor may offer a reward of not more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), payable out of the General Fund, for information leading to the arrest and conviction of any person who commits arson upon a place of worship.

(d) The reward shall be paid to the person giving the information, promptly upon the conviction of the person so arrested, after a recommendation from the United States Attorney, or the California Attorney General, or the district attorney and the chief law enforcement officer, or his or her designate, in the jurisdiction where the crime occurred. Rewards shall only be paid to the person if the information is given voluntarily, at the person’s own initiative. Rewards shall not be paid as part of any plea bargain.

(e) The reward may also be paid to the person giving the information if both of the following are met:

(1) The arrest or conviction of the person for an offense described in subdivision (a), (b), or (c) is rendered impossible by an intervening event, including, but not limited to, the death of the person during a pursuit by law enforcement, or while in custody.

(2) The appropriate law enforcement officials, after reviewing the evidence related to the crime or crimes, determine that the person is the individual responsible for the crime or crimes for which the reward was offered, and that the information would have reasonably led to the arrest and conviction of that person.

(f) If more than one claimant is eligible for any reward issued pursuant to this section, the Governor may apportion the reward money in a manner the Governor deems appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 529, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1548.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Governor” means any person performing the functions of Governor by authority of the law of this State.

(b) “Executive authority” means the Governor or any person performing the functions of Governor in a State other than this State.

(c) “State,” referring to a State other than the State of California, means any other State or Territory, organized or unorganized, of the United States of America.

(d) “Laws of the United States” means: (1) those laws of the United States passed by Congress pursuant to authority given to Congress by the Constitution of the United States where the laws of the United States are controlling, and (2) those laws of the United States not controlling the several States of the United States but which are not in conflict with the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 554.)
-------------------------------------------

1548.1.

Subject to the provisions of this chapter, the Constitution of the United States, and the laws of the United States, it is the duty of the Governor of this State to have arrested and delivered up to the executive authority of any other State any person charged in that State with treason, felony, or other crime, who has fled from justice and is found in this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 554.)
-------------------------------------------

1548.2.

No demand for the extradition of a person charged with crime in another State shall be recognized by the Governor unless it is in writing alleging that the accused was present in the demanding State at the time of the commission of the alleged crime, and that thereafter he fled from that State. Such demand shall be accompanied by a copy of an indictment found or by information or by a copy of an affidavit made before a magistrate in the demanding State together with a copy of any warrant which was issued thereon; or such demand shall be accompanied by a copy of a judgment of conviction or of a sentence imposed in execution thereof, together with a statement by the executive
 authority of the demanding State that the person claimed has escaped from confinement or has violated the terms of his bail, probation or parole. The indictment, information, or affidavit made before the magistrate must substantially charge the person demanded with having committed a crime under the law of that State; and the copy of indictment, information, affidavit, judgment of conviction or sentence must be certified as authentic by the executive authority making the demand.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 554.)
-------------------------------------------

1548.3.

When a demand is made upon the Governor of this State by the executive authority of another State for the surrender of a person so charged with crime, the Governor may call upon the Attorney General or any district attorney in this State to investigate or assist in investigating the demand, and to report to him the situation and circumstances of the person so demanded, and whether he ought to be surrendered according to the provision of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 554.)
-------------------------------------------

1549.

When it is desired to have returned to this state a person charged in this state with a crime, and the person is imprisoned or is held under criminal proceedings then pending against him or her in another state, the Governor of this state may agree with the executive authority of the other state for the extradition of the person before the conclusion of the proceedings or his or her term of sentence in the other state, upon the condition that the person be returned to the other state at the expense of this state as soon as the prosecution in this state is terminated.

The Governor of this state may also surrender
 on demand of the executive authority of any other state any person in this state who is charged in the manner provided in Section 1548.2 with having violated the laws of the demanding state even though such person left the demanding state involuntarily.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 101.)
-------------------------------------------

1549.1.

The Governor of this state may also surrender, on demand of the executive authority of any other state, any person in this state charged in the other state in the manner provided in Section 1548.2 with committing an act in this state, or in a third state, intentionally resulting in a crime in the state whose executive authority is making the demand. The provisions of this chapter, not otherwise inconsistent, shall apply to those cases, even though the accused was not in the demanding state at the time of the commission of the crime, and has not fled therefrom. Neither the demand, the oath, nor any proceedings under this chapter pursuant to this section
 need state or show that the accused has fled from justice from, or at the time of the commission of the crime was in, the demanding or other state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

1549.15.

For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Gender-affirming health care” and “gender-affirming mental health care” have the same meaning as in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 16010.2 of the Welfare and
 Institutions Code.

(b) (1) “Legally
 protected health care activity” means any of the following:

(A) The exercise and enjoyment, or attempted exercise and enjoyment, by a person of rights to reproductive health care services, gender-affirming health care services, or gender-affirming mental health care services secured by the Constitution or laws of California or the provision by a health care service plan contract or a policy, or a certificate of health insurance, that provides for such services.

(B) An act or omission undertaken to aid or encourage, or attempt to aid or encourage, a person in the exercise and enjoyment or attempted exercise and enjoyment of rights to reproductive health care services, gender-affirming health care services, or gender-affirming mental health care services secured by the Constitution or laws of California.

(C) The
 provision of reproductive health care services, gender-affirming health care services, or gender-affirming mental health care services by a person duly licensed under the laws of California or the coverage of, and reimbursement for, those services or care by a health care service plan or a health insurer, if the service or care is lawful under the laws of California, regardless of the patient’s location.

(2) “Legally protected health care activity” does not include any activity that would be deemed unprofessional conduct or that would violate antidiscrimination laws of California.

(c) “Reproductive health care services” means and includes all services, care, or products of a medical, surgical, psychiatric, therapeutic, diagnostic, mental health, behavioral health, preventative, rehabilitative, supportive, consultative, referral, prescribing, or dispensing nature relating to the human reproductive system provided in accordance with the constitution and laws of this state, whether provided in person or by means of telehealth services which includes, but is not limited to, all services, care, and products relating to pregnancy, the termination of a pregnancy, assisted reproduction, or contraception.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 260, Sec. 18.   (SB 345)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1549.2.

If a demand conforms to the provisions of this chapter, the Governor or agent authorized in writing by the Governor whose authorization has been filed with the Secretary of State shall sign a warrant of arrest, which shall be sealed with the State Seal, and shall be directed to any peace officer or other person whom he may entrust with the execution thereof. The warrant must substantially recite the facts necessary to the validity of its issuance. The provisions of Section 850 shall be applicable to such warrant, except that it shall not be necessary to include a warrant number, address, or description of the subject, provided that a complaint under
 Section 1551 is then pending against the subject.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 793, Sec. 1.2.)
-------------------------------------------

1549.3.

Such warrant shall authorize the peace officer or other person to whom it is directed:

(a) To arrest the accused at any time and any place where he may be found within the State;

(b) To command the aid of all peace officers or other persons in the execution of the warrant; and

(c) To deliver the accused, subject to the provisions of this chapter, to the duly authorized agent of the demanding State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 554.)
-------------------------------------------

1550.1.

No person arrested upon such warrant shall be delivered over to the agent of the executive authority demanding him unless he is first taken forthwith before a magistrate, who shall inform him of the demand made for his surrender, and of the crime with which he is charged, and that he has the right to demand and procure counsel. If the accused or his counsel desires to test the legality of the arrest, the magistrate shall remand the accused to custody, and fix a reasonable time to be allowed him within which to apply for a writ of habeas corpus. If the writ is denied, and probable cause appears for an application for a writ of habeas corpus to another